Utah statutes.
31A-28-214.   Examination of the association -- Annual report.

(1)  The association is subject to examination and regulation by the commissioner.

(2)  The board of directors shall submit, to the commission by no later than April 30 of each year:

(a)  a financial report for the preceding calendar year in a form approved by the commissioner; and

(b)  a report of the association's activities during the preceding calendar year.



Amended by Chapter 363, 2001 General Session

